Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2302
Legislative intent.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a means by which excavators may notify operators of underground facilities in an excavation area so that operators have the opportunity to identify and locate the underground facilities prior to excavation and so that the excavators may then observe proper precautions to safeguard the underground facilities from damage.

(2) It is the purpose of the One-Call Notification System Act to aid the public by preventing injury to persons and damage to property and the interruption of utility services resulting from accidents caused by damage to underground facilities.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 2.